New York, session 2025-2026, A5730.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Financial 2 App Security Act". 3 § 2. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 399- 4 jj to read as follows: 5 § 399-jj. Peer-to-peer mobile payment service security. 1. For the 6 purposes of this section: 7 (a) "Peer-to-peer mobile service" means any app or app service 8 provided directly to users by an entity that is not an insured deposito- 9 ry institution and that: 10 (1) directly or indirectly receives and holds money belonging to 11 users, or that facilitates transactions between insured depository 12 institutions but exists separately from said institutions; and 13 (2) whose primary functionality is to allow users to send and receive 14 money through their mobile devices from a linked bank account or credit 15 card or debit card using a recipient's cell phone number or email 16 address or username. 17 (b) "Biometric authentication" means either fingerprint or face iden- 18 tification for access to a service, or verification of an in-app action. 19 2. Every peer-to-peer mobile service shall require users to create a 20 personal identification code associated with the user's account that is 21 a minimum of four numeric characters associated with the user's account. 22 When certain actions are taken, including but not limited to, actions 23 defined in subdivision four of this section, the personal identification 24 number must be used to authenticate the user's identity. The use of 25 such personal identification code may not be substituted for any form of 26 biometric authentication. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01953-01-5 A. 5730 2 1 3. Every peer-to-peer mobile service shall require users to set a 2 monetary amount for intended transfers above which the use of a personal 3 identification number will be required to authenticate the user's iden- 4 tity and provide an option for users to opt-in of such requirement. 5 4. The following actions require use of a personal identification 6 number when using a peer-to-peer mobile service: 7 (a) any payment transaction initiated by the user exceeding the mone- 8 tary limit set by said user; 9 (b) payment transactions initiated by the user that would bring said 10 users twenty-four-hour payment transaction amount exceeding the monetary 11 limit set by said user starting from the first transaction; 12 (c) payment transactions initiated by the user to another user whose 13 account was created less than twenty-four hours prior to said trans- 14 action; 15 (d) any payment transactions initiated by the user after three 16 successful payment transactions initiated by the user have been made 17 within sixty minutes for amounts under the user's set monetary limit; 18 (e) any attempt to sign in to the service by the user to a new and/or 19 unrecognized device; and 20 (f) any attempt to sign in to the service after the account password 21 has been reset in any manner, including but not limited to, password 22 recovery service offered by the service. 23 5. A user's account will be locked after five unsuccessful attempts 24 within a twenty-four hour period to input said user's personal identifi- 25 cation number when required. The peer-to-peer mobile service can unlock 26 said account after twenty-four hours if said user is able to verify 27 their identity through a telephone call or security questions created by 28 the user. 29 6. Any payment transactions initiated by the user after three success- 30 ful payment transactions initiated by the user have been made within 31 sixty minutes after the first successful payment to the same recipient 32 for amounts, despite the input of the user's correct personal identifi- 33 cation number, will require additional identity verification of the 34 recipient if: 35 (a) any of the transactions exceed the greater amount of either the 36 user's set monetary limit or one thousand dollars; or 37 (b) the aggregate amount of the transactions exceed the greater amount 38 of either the user's set monetary limit or one thousand dollars; or 39 (c) the recipient is a first time transaction to the user. 40 7. Any transaction that could be the result of fraud can be cancelled 41 by the user making the payment after timely notification is made to the 42 peer-to-peer mobile service. 43 8. Any peer-to-peer mobile service that does not comply with this 44 section is prohibited from offering its services to users residing in 45 the state of New York. 46 § 3. Subsection (b) of section 403 of the financial services law is 47 amended to read as follows: 48 (b) The financial frauds and consumer protection unit shall be a qual- 49 ified agency, as defined in section eight hundred thirty-five of the 50 executive law, to enforce the provisions of this article and article 51 four of the insurance law and article II-B of the banking law and 52 section three hundred ninety-nine-jj of the general business law. 53 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 54 it shall have become a law.